Utah statutes.
59-10-501.    Rulemaking authority -- Federal income tax return information.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules to allow a taxpayer to submit specified excerpts from the taxpayer's federal income tax return rather than submitting a copy of the taxpayer's entire federal income tax return.

